Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 28 Educational Television
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-28-1 — 16-28-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3514, §§ 1-3; G.L. 1956, §§

16-28-1

— 16-28-3; Repealed by P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 22. For present similar provisions of law, see §

16-61-1

et seq.

16-28-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3514, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-28-4

; P.L. 1979, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 226, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 23; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 8, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-28-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3514, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-28-5

; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-28-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3514, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

16-28-6

; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

16-28-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 226, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 1982, ch. 414, § 3, effective May 20, 1982.